Mississippi, session 2026, HB629.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 37-146-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-146-7.  Identification and recruitment of undergraduate participants; designation of underserved or rural area; applicant qualifications; maximum number of new admissions per year.  (1) The commission shall develop and implement policies and procedures designed to recruit, identify and enroll undergraduate students who demonstrate necessary interest, commitment, aptitude and academic achievement to pursue careers as dentists in rural or dentally underserved areas of Mississippi, and to develop and implement the programs designed to foster successful entry of participants into dental school, completion of dental school, and establishment and maintenance of a career in dentistry in a rural or underserved area of Mississippi. (2)  The commission shall have the authority through use of generally applicable definitions, to designate an area of the state as underserved or rural. (3)  The commission, in conjunction with the University of Mississippi Medical Center, shall have the authority to provide students selected for scholarship funding with faculty mentors and other programs designed to enhance the students' likelihood of admission to the dental school.  The commission and the University of Mississippi Medical Center will develop coursework that will help provide scholarship students with the skills necessary for sustained and successful dental practice in rural Mississippi. (4)  Each applicant for admission to the program must submit an application to the commission that conforms to requirements established by the commission. (5)  In selecting participants for the program, the board may only accept an applicant if his or her academic record and other characteristics, if given consideration by the University of Mississippi School of Dentistry Admissions Committee, would be considered credible and competitive. (6)  An applicant for the program may be admitted only upon a majority vote of the members of the commission. (7)  Up to * * *three (3) six (6) students will be admitted to the Mississippi Rural Dentists Scholarship Program each year. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.